Utah statutes.
4-4-5.   Maintenance of candling records -- Inspection of records.
Every person who sells, offers, or exposes eggs for sale or exchange shall
maintain candling records as prescribed by the department. All candling
records shall be open for examination by accredited inspectors or
representatives of the department at reasonable times.
